Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 9. SAFETY

SUBTITLE C. FIRE

CHAPTER 793. DISABLING FIRE EXIT ALARMS

Sec. 793.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Fire exit" means a door, window, or other means of egress from a building that has been expressly designated as a fire escape or emergency exit by a sign, light, or other device located on or in the immediate vicinity of the fire escape or exit.

(2) "Fire exit alarm" means a device designed to sound an alarm when a fire exit is opened or an attempt to open a fire exit is made.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 793.002. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if:

(1) the person intentionally or knowingly causes a fire exit alarm to fail to sound an alarm; and

(2) the person is not authorized to do so by a person having lawful custody or control of the building or the part of the building in which the fire exit is located.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.